District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.10

Compensation — Members of the Board of Education.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, each member of the District of Columbia Board of Education shall receive a salary of not more than $15,000 annually; except the President of the Board of Education shall receive not more than $16,000 annually. These sums shall not increase unless by an act of the Council.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1110, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-175, § 3(b), 33 DCR 7232
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 301(a), 43 DCR 4569
Board of education, limitations on member compensation, see § 1-204.95.
This section is referenced in § 1-602.02 and § 38-2651.
1981 Ed., § 1-612.10.
1973 Ed., § 1-341.10.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 301(a) of Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-226, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2584).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 301(a) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-2, February 19, 1997, 44 DCR 1590).
Section 1001 of D.C. Act 12-2 provided for the application of the act.
Application of 11-198: Section 1001 of D.C. Law 11-198 provided that Titles I, II, III, V, and VI and sections 405 and 406 of the act shall apply after September 30, 1996.